Washington statutes.
RCW 33.48.140

Legislative intent—Chapter to control over conflicting provisions.

It is the intention of the legislature to grant, by this chapter, authority to create stock associations in this state, by either organization or conversion under its provisions, and in the event of conflict between the provisions of this chapter and other provisions of Title 33 RCW, such other provisions shall be construed in favor of the accomplishment of the purposes of this chapter.

[ 1982 c 3 s 99; 1955 c 122 s 15.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.